Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB234.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 337 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Business entity" means a partnership, corporation, association, limited
liability company, or other legal entity, or a division or subsidiary thereof;
(b) "Employment" means work for a person;
(c) "Non-compete clause" means a term or condition of employment that
prohibits a worker from, penalizes a worker for, or functions to prevent a
worker from:
1. Seeking or accepting work in the United States with a different person
where such work would begin after the conclusion of the employment
that includes the term or condition; or
2. Operating a business in the United States after the conclusion of the
employment that includes the term or condition;
(d) "Term or condition of employment" includes but is not limited to a
contractual term or workplace policy, whether written or oral;
(e) "Officer" means a president, vice president, secretary, treasurer or
principal financial officer, comptroller or principal accounting officer, and
any natural person routinely performing corresponding functions with
respect to any business entity whether incorporated or unincorporated;
(f) "Person" means any natural person, partnership, corporation, association,
or other legal entity within the commissioner's jurisdiction, including any
person acting under color or authority of state law;
(g) "Policy-making authority" means final authority to make policy decisions
that control significant aspects of a business entity or common enterprise
Page 1 of 7
XXXX 2/18/2025 10:01 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1633
and does not include authority limited to advising or exerting influence over
such policy decisions or having final authority to make policy decisions for
only a subsidiary of or affiliate of a common enterprise;
(h) "Policy-making position" means a business entity's president, chief
executive officer or the equivalent, any other officer of a business entity
who has policy-making authority, or any other natural person who has
policy-making authority for the business entity similar to an officer with
policy-making authority. An officer of a subsidiary or affiliate of a business
entity that is part of a common enterprise who has policy-making authority
for the common enterprise may be deemed to have a policy-making position
for purposes of this paragraph. A natural person who does not have policy-
making authority over a common enterprise may not be deemed to have a
policy-making position even if the person has policy-making authority over
a subsidiary or affiliate of a business entity that is part of the common
enterprise;
(i) "Preceding year" means a person's choice among the following time
periods:
1. The most recent fifty-two (52)-week year;
2. The most recent calendar year;
3. The most recent fiscal year; or
4. The most recent year of anniversary of hire;
(j) "Senior executive" means a worker who:
1. Was in a policy-making position; and
2. Received from a person in exchange for employment:
a. Total annual compensation of at least one hundred fifty-one
thousand one hundred sixty-four dollars ($151,164) in the
preceding year;
Page 2 of 7
XXXX 2/18/2025 10:01 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1633
b. Total compensation of at least one hundred fifty-one thousand
one hundred sixty-four dollars ($151,164) when annualized if
the worker was employed during only part of the preceding year;
or
c. Total compensation of at least one hundred fifty-one thousand
one hundred sixty-four dollars ($151,164) when annualized in
the preceding year prior to the worker's departure if the worker
departed from employment prior to the preceding year and the
worker is subject to a non-compete claus;
(k) "Total annual compensation" means the worker's earnings over the
preceding year. "Total annual compensation" may include salary,
commissions, nondiscretionary bonuses, and other nondiscretionary
compensation earned during that fifty-two (52) week period. "Total annual
compensation" does not include board, lodging and other facilities as
defined in 29 C.F.R. 541.606, and does not include payments for medical
insurance, payments for life insurance, contributions to retirement plans,
and the cost of other similar fringe benefits; and
(l) "Worker" means a natural person who works or who previously worked,
whether paid or unpaid, without regard to the worker's title or the worker's
status under any other state or federal laws, including but not limited to
whether the worker is an employee, independent contractor, extern, intern,
volunteer, apprentice, or a sole proprietor who provides a service to a
person. "Worker" includes a natural person who works for a franchisee or
franchisor, but does not include a franchisee in the context of a franchisee-
franchisor relationship.
(2) (a) With respect to workers other than a senior executive, it shall be an unfair
method of competition for a person to:
Page 3 of 7
XXXX 2/18/2025 10:01 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1633
1. Enter into or attempt to enter into a non-compete clause;
2. Enforce or attempt to enforce a non-compete clause; or
3. Represent that the worker is subject to a non-compete clause.
(b) With respect to a senior executive, it shall be an unfair method of
competition for a person to:
1. Enter into or attempt to enter into a non-compete clause;
2. Enforce or attempt to enforce a non-compete clause entered into after
the effective date; or
3. Represent that the senior executive is subject to a non-compete clause,
where the non-compete clause was entered into after the effective date.
(3) (a) For each existing non-compete clause that is an unfair method of
competition pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the person who
entered into the non-compete clause with the worker must provide clear and
conspicuous notice to the worker by the effective date of this Act that the
worker's non-compete clause will not be, and cannot legally be, enforced
against the worker.
(b) The notice to the worker required by paragraph (a) of this subsection shall:
1. Identify the person who entered into the non-compete clause with the
worker; and
2. Be in writing; and
a. Delivered by hand to the worker;
b. Delivered by mail at the worker's last known personal street
address;
c. Emailed to the last known personal email address of the worker;
or
d. Sent by text message at a mobile telephone number belonging to
the worker.
Page 4 of 7
XXXX 2/18/2025 10:01 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1633
(c) If a person who is required to provide notice under this subsection has no
record of a street address, email address, or mobile telephone number, that
person is exempt from the notice requirement in this subsection.
(d) For purposes of this subsection, the inclusion of the following terms
constitutes notice to the worker that the worker's non-compete clause
cannot legally be enforced and will not be enforced against the worker:
1. The date of the employer's choosing, provided it is no later than the
effective date of this Act, informing the worker that any non-compete
clause will not be enforceable;
2. Informing the worker that he or she is able to accept a job with any
company or person, even if he or she competes with their current
employer;
3. Informing the worker that he or she is able to run his or her own
business, even if it competes with his or her current employer;
4. Informing the worker that he or she is able to compete with his or her
current employer following employment with said employer; and
5. Informing the worker that this new rule does not affect any other
terms or conditions of his or her employment.
(e) A person complies with the requirement of this subsection if the person
provides notice to a worker in accordance with paragraph (b) of this
subsection.
(f) In addition to providing the notice required in paragraph (b) of this
subsection in English, a person is permitted to provide such notice in a
language (or in languages) other than English, or to include internet links
to translations in additional languages.
(4) (a) The requirements of this section shall not apply to a non-compete clause
that is entered into by a person pursuant to a bona fide sale of a business
Page 5 of 7
XXXX 2/18/2025 10:01 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1633
entity, of the person's ownership interest in a business entity, or of all or
substantially all of a business entity's operating assets.
(b) The requirements of this section shall not apply where a cause of action
related to a non-compete clause accrued prior to the effective date.
(c) It is not an unfair method of competition to enforce or attempt to enforce a
non-compete clause or to make representations about a non-compete clause
where a person has a good-faith basis to believe that this section is
inapplicable.
(5) (a) This section shall not be construed to annul, or exempt any person from
complying with any state statute, regulation, order, or interpretation
applicable to a non-compete clause, including, but not limited to, state
antitrust and consumer protection laws and state common law, except that
this part supersedes such laws to the extent, and only to the extent, that such
laws would otherwise permit or authorize a person to engage in conduct
that is an unfair method of competition under subsection (2)(a) of this
section or in conflict with the notice requirement in subsection (3) of this
section.
(b) Except with respect to laws superseded under paragraph (a) of this section,
no provision of this section shall be construed as altering, limiting, or
affecting the authority of the Kentucky Attorney General or any other
regulatory or enforcement agency or entity or the rights of a person to bring
a claim or regulatory action arising under any state statute, regulation,
order, or interpretation, including, but not limited to, state antitrust and
consumer protection laws and state common law.
(6) If any provision of this section is held to be invalid or unenforceable by its terms,
or as applied to any person or circumstance, or stayed pending further agency
action, the provision shall be construed so as to continue to give the maximum
Page 6 of 7
XXXX 2/18/2025 10:01 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1633
effect to the provision permitted by law and such invalidity shall not affect the
application of the provision to other persons or circumstances or the validity or
application of other provisions. If any provision or application of this section is
held to be invalid or unenforceable, the provision or application shall be
severable from this section and shall not affect the remainder thereof.
Page 7 of 7
XXXX 2/18/2025 10:01 AM Jacketed